test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-lex_der_caahad_gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Verb - čaahâđ: # MLO, checked

    čaahâđ+V+Inf: čaahâđ
    čaahâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: čahhuum
    čaahâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: čáhhoo
    čaahâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+Du1: čáhhojeen
    čaahâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: čáhhojeh
    čaahâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: čahhuu
    čaahâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: čáhhojim
    čaahâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: čahhui
    čaahâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: čáhhojii
    čaahâđ+V+Der/st+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: čavâstâm
    čaahâđ+V+Der/st+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: čaavâst
    čaahâđ+V+Der/st+V+Ind+Prs+Du1: čavâsteen
    čaahâđ+V+Der/st+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: čavâsteh
    čaahâđ+V+Der/st+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: čaavâst
    čaahâđ+V+Der/st+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: čavâstim
    čaahâđ+V+Der/st+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: čavâstij
    čaahâđ+V+Der/st+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: čavâstii
    čaahâđ+V+Der/d+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: čavâdâm
    čaahâđ+V+Der/d+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: čaavvâd
    čaahâđ+V+Der/d+V+Ind+Prs+Du1: čavâdeen
    čaahâđ+V+Der/d+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: čavâdeh
    čaahâđ+V+Der/d+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: čaavvâd
    čaahâđ+V+Der/d+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: čavâdim
    čaahâđ+V+Der/d+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: čavâdij
    čaahâđ+V+Der/d+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: čavâdii
    čaahâđ+V+Der/t+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: čavâttâm
    čaahâđ+V+Der/t+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: čaavvât
    čaahâđ+V+Der/t+V+Ind+Prs+Du1: čavâtteen
    čaahâđ+V+Der/t+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: čavâtteh
    čaahâđ+V+Der/t+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: čaavvât
    čaahâđ+V+Der/t+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: čavâttim
    čaahâđ+V+Der/t+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: čavâttij
    čaahâđ+V+Der/t+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: čavâttii
    čaahâđ+V+Der/alla+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: čahâlâm
    čaahâđ+V+Der/alla+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: čaahâl
    čaahâđ+V+Der/alla+V+Ind+Prs+Du1: čahâleen
    čaahâđ+V+Der/alla+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: čahâleh
    čaahâđ+V+Der/alla+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: čaahâl
    čaahâđ+V+Der/alla+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: čahâlim
    čaahâđ+V+Der/alla+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: čahâlij
    čaahâđ+V+Der/alla+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: čahâlii
    čaahâđ+V+Der/kyetti+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: čavâškuáđám
    čaahâđ+V+Der/kyetti+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: čavâškuát
    čaahâđ+V+Der/kyetti+V+Ind+Prs+Du1: čavâškyetteen
    čaahâđ+V+Der/kyetti+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: čavâškyeteh
    čaahâđ+V+Der/kyetti+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: čavâškyetih
    čaahâđ+V+Der/kyetti+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: čavâškyeđe
    čaahâđ+V+Der/kyetti+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: čavâškuottim
    čaahâđ+V+Der/kyetti+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: čavâškuođij
    čaahâđ+V+Der/kyetti+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: čavâškuottii
